West Virginia, session 2026, HB5684.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5. GENERAL POWERS AND AUTHORITY OF THE GOVERNOR, SECRETARY OF STATE AND ATTORNEY GENERAL; BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS; MISCELLANEOUS AGENCIES, COMMISSIONS, OFFICES, PROGRAMS, ETC. ARTICLE 10. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ACT. §5-10-48. Reemployment after retirement; options for holder of elected public office. (a) The Legislature finds that a compelling state interest exists in maintaining an actuarially sound retirement system and that this interest necessitates that certain limitations be placed upon an individual’s ability to retire from the system and to then later return to state employment as an employee with a participating public employer while contemporaneously drawing an annuity from the system. The Legislature hereby further finds and declares that the interests of the public are served when persons having retired from public employment are permitted, within certain limitations, to render post-retirement employment in positions of public service, either in elected or appointed capacities. The Legislature further finds and declares that it has the need for qualified employees and that in many cases an employee of the Legislature will retire and be available to return to work for the Legislature as a per diem employee. The Legislature further finds and declares that in many instances these employees have particularly valuable expertise which the Legislature cannot find elsewhere. The Legislature further finds and declares that reemploying these persons on a limited per diem basis after they have retired is not only in the best interests of this state but has no adverse effect whatsoever upon the actuarial soundness of this particular retirement system.(b) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Regularly employed on a full-time basis" means employment of an individual by a participating public employer, in a position other than as an elected or appointed public official, which normally requires 12 months per year service and at least 1,040 hours of service per year in that position; (2) "temporary full-time employment" or "temporary part-time employment" means employment of an individual on a temporary or provisional basis by a participating public employer, other than as an elected or appointed public official, in a position which does not otherwise render the individual as regularly employed; (3) "former employee of the Legislature" means any person who has retired from employment with the Legislature and who has at least 10 years’ contributing service with the Legislature; and (4) "reemployed by the Legislature" means a former employee of the Legislature who has been reemployed on a per diem basis not to exceed 175 days per calendar year.(c) Subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section, if a retirant becomes regularly employed on a full-time basis by a participating public employer, payment of his or her annuity shall be suspended during the period of his or her reemployment and he or she shall become a contributing member to the retirement system. If his or her reemployment is for a period of one year or longer, his or her annuity shall be recalculated and he or she shall be granted an increased annuity due to the additional employment, the annuity to be computed according to §5-10-22 of this code. If his or her reemployment is for a period less than one year, he or she may request in writing that the employee and employer retirement contributions submitted during reemployment be credited to the participating public employer pursuant to §5-10-44 of this code, and his or her previous annuity shall be reinstated effective the first day of the month following termination of reemployment and the board's receipt of written notice thereof. Subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section, a retirant may accept legislative per diem, temporary full-time, or temporary part-time employment from a participating employer without suspending his or her retirement annuity so long as he or she does not receive annual compensation in excess of $25,000.(d) Senior judges, justices, and magistrates. —(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, a retired intermediate court judge, circuit court judge, or family court judge, or justice who is recalled and assigned to temporary service as a senior judge or justice by the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals may receive per diem compensation pursuant to the requirements of §51-9-10 of this code while continuing to receive his or her annuity, subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, a retired magistrate who is recalled and assigned to temporary service as a senior magistrate by the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals may receive per diem compensation pursuant to the requirements of §50-1-6a of this code while continuing to receive his or her annuity, subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section.(e) Subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section, if a member retires and is then subsequently elected to a public office, or is subsequently appointed to hold an elected public office, or is a former employee of the Legislature who has been reemployed by the Legislature, he or she has the option, notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, to either:(1) Continue to receive payment of his or her annuity while holding public office, or during any reemployment of a former employee of the Legislature on a per diem basis, in addition to the salary he or she may be entitled to as an office holder, or as a per diem reemployed former employee of the Legislature; or(2) Suspend the payment of his or her annuity and become a contributing member of the retirement system as provided in subsection (c) of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a member who is participating in the system as an elected public official may not retire from his or her elected position and commence to receive an annuity from the system and then be elected or reappointed to the same position unless and until a continuous 12-month period has passed since his or her retirement from the position: Provided, That a former employee of the Legislature may not be reemployed by the Legislature on a per diem basis until at least 60 days after the employee has retired: Provided, however, That the limitation on compensation provided by subsection (c) of this section does not apply to the reemployed former employee: Provided further, That in no event may reemployment by the Legislature of a per diem employee exceed 175 days per calendar year.(f) Subject to the provisions of subsection (i) of this section, a member who is participating in the system simultaneously as both a regular, full-time employee of a participating public employer, and as an elected or appointed member of the legislative body of the state or any political subdivision, may, upon meeting the age and service requirements of this article, elect to retire from his or her regular full-time state employment and may commence to receive an annuity from the system without terminating his or her position as a member of the legislative body of the state or political subdivision: Provided, That the retired member shall not, during the term of his or her retirement and continued service as a member of the legislative body of a political subdivision, be eligible to continue his or her participation as a contributing member of the system and shall not continue to accrue any additional service credit or benefits in the system related to the continued service.(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of §5-10-27b of this code, any publicly elected member of the legislative body of any political subdivision or of the State Legislature, the Clerk of the House of Delegates, and the Clerk of the Senate may elect to commence receiving in-service retirement distributions from this system upon attaining the age of 70 and one-half years: Provided, That the member is eligible to retire under the provisions of §5-10-20 or §5-10-21 of this code: Provided, however, That the member elects to stop actively contributing to the system while receiving the in-service distributions.(h) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a severe shortage of child protective services workers and adult protective services workers exists throughout the state, and therefore, a compelling state interest exists in expanding the use of retired employees to serve this critical need. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (c) of this section to the contrary, a person receiving retirement benefits or who is eligible to receive retirement benefits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, may accept employment as a child protective services worker or an adult protective services worker on a full-time or part-time basis without having payment of his or her retirement annuity suspended and without reentering the retirement system as a contributing member. This subsection is only applicable if the retired employee meets the minimum qualifications of the position, has been retired for at least 60 days, and is hired to fill an existing child protective services or adult protective services vacancy. The retired employee may continue to work under this subsection only as long as that position remains vacant. The vacant position shall be posted until it is filled by a regularly employed person meeting the minimum qualifications to serve as a child protective service worker or an adult protective service worker. The provisions of this subsection shall expire July 1, 2025.(i) Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a retirant who becomes employed by a participating public employer after the effective date of his or her retirement must have a bona fide separation from service upon retirement to be eligible for an annuity under the retirement system. If a retirant fails to have a bona fide separation from service upon retirement or if such retirant or his or her participating public employer fails to comply with §5-10-19 in a manner satisfactory to the board, then the member’s retirement shall be voided and the member shall repay to the system the gross amount of all annuity payments received related to such voided retirement. The board may take any actions necessary or appropriate in accordance with the provisions of §5-10-44 to recover such annuity payments so that an in-service distribution is not deemed to have been made. (j) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a severe shortage of attorneys to represent children in child welfare matters exists throughout the state, and therefore, a compelling state interest exists in expanding the use of retired employees to serve as child protection commissioners or circuit court law clerks. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (c) of this section to the contrary, a licensed attorney receiving retirement benefits or who is eligible to receive retirement benefits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, may accept employment from the Supreme Court of Appeals as a child protection commissioner or circuit court law clerk on a full-time or part-time basis without having payment of his or her retirement annuity suspended and without reentering the retirement system as a contributing member. This subsection is only applicable if the retired employee meets the minimum qualifications of the position and has been retired for at least 60 days. The retired employee may continue to work under this subsection only as long as that position remains vacant. The vacant position shall be posted until it is filled by a regularly employed person meeting the minimum qualifications to serve as a child protection commissioner or circuit court law clerk. CHAPTER 49. CHILD WELFARE. Article 1. general provisions and definitions. §49-1-207. Definitions related to court actions. When used in this chapter, terms defined in this section have the meanings ascribed to them that relate to, but are not limited to, court actions, except in those instances where a different meaning is provided or the context in which the word is used clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended.“Court” means the circuit court of the county with jurisdiction of the case or the judge in vacation unless otherwise specifically provided.“Court appointed special advocate (CASA) program” means a community organization that screens, trains, and supervises CASA volunteers to advocate for the best interests of children who are involved in abuse and neglect proceedings pursuant to §49-3-102 of this code.“Extrajudicial Statement” means any utterance, written or oral, which was made outside of court.“Juvenile referee” means a magistrate appointed by the circuit court to perform the functions expressly prescribed for a referee under the provisions of this chapter.“Multidisciplinary team” means a group of professionals and paraprofessionals representing a variety of disciplines who interact and coordinate their efforts to identify, diagnose and treat specific cases of child abuse and neglect. Multidisciplinary teams may include, but are not limited to, medical, educational, childcare and law-enforcement personnel, social workers, psychologists, and psychiatrists. Their goal is to pool their respective skills in order to formulate accurate diagnoses and to provide comprehensive coordinated treatment with continuity and follow-up for both parents and children.“Community team” means a multidisciplinary group which addresses the general problem of child abuse and neglect in a given community and may consist of several multidisciplinary teams with different functions.“Child protection commissioner” means an individual appointed by the Supreme Court of Appeals to manage portions of a court case filed pursuant to this chapter.“Res gestae” means a spontaneous declaration made by a person immediately after an event and before the person has had an opportunity to conjure a falsehood.“Valid court order” means an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction relating to a child brought before the court and who is the subject of that order. Prior to the entry of the order the child shall receive the full due process rights guaranteed to that child or juvenile by the Constitutions of the United States and the State of West Virginia.“Violation of a traffic law of West Virginia” means a violation of chapter 17A, 17B, 17C, or 17D of this code, except a violation of §17C-4-1 or §17C-4-2 of this code relating to hit and run, or §17C-5-1, §17C-5-2, or §17C-5-3 of this code, relating, respectively, to vehicular homicide, aggravated vehicular homicide, vehicular homicide in a school zone, vehicular homicide in a construction zone, driving under the influence of alcohol, controlled substances or drugs and reckless driving. ARTICLE 4.  COURT ACTIONS. §49-4-118. Child protection commissioner created; powers and duties. (a) The Supreme Court of Appeals is requested to create a pilot project utilizing child protection commissioners to encourage efficiency and ensure accountability in court actions filed pursuant to this chapter. (b) A child protection commissioner is a judicial officer and shall be appointed, and may be removed, by the Supreme Court of Appeals for a two-year term that may be renewed, and is subject to the administrative oversight, training, and standards established by the Supreme Court of Appeals. (c) A child protection commissioner shall be an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and possess experience or training in juvenile law, as determined by rules of the Supreme Court of Appeals.(d) The Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Appeals may designate multi-circuit child protection commissioner regions to carry out the purpose of this section, and a child protection commissioner may serve in that capacity in more than one circuit simultaneously.  (e) Subject to the direction and oversight of the chief circuit judge, a child protection commissioner may authorize emergency removals as permitted by law, monitor diversion and pre-petition matters, conduct evidentiary and status hearings, compel witnesses to testify and place them under oath, order services and visitation, determine child-support, custody, sibling visitation, grandparent visitation, and post termination-visitation in matters pending in circuit court under Rule 6 of the Rules of Procedure for Child Abuse and Neglect Proceedings, facilitate multi-disciplinary team meetings, manage discovery, oversee improvement periods and case plans, remove individuals from treatment court programs, and perform all other duties authorized by rules promulgated by the Supreme Court of Appeals. (f) The child protection commissioner may issue a non-binding report and recommendations to the presiding circuit judge regarding findings of fact and conclusions of law for a preliminary, adjudication, disposition, or permanency hearing, contempt, termination of an improvement period, placement, or referral to a treatment court; however, the circuit court shall retain the sole authority to enter orders on these matters. A child protection commissioner shall not exercise independent contempt authority. Any party may object to a child protection commissioner’s report and recommendations within 10 days of their entry and filing, and the circuit judge shall review the record made before the child protection commissioner, the recommended decision of the child protection commissioner, and the objections and exceptions which have been filed, and the court shall enter an order.  (g) A child protection commissioner shall be paid by the Supreme Court of Appeals at the rate it establishes and may also receive travel reimbursement as provided by Supreme Court of Appeals policy. The Supreme Court of Appeals shall provide all necessary equipment for a child protection commissioner to perform his or her duties, and may, at its discretion, acquire or lease the necessary facilities as required. A child protection commissioner may be either a full-time employee or paid hourly depending on workload necessities as determined by the Administrative Director. (h) The Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Appeals will identify and report annually, to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance, on measurable outcomes to be improved for the pilot program referenced in this section, and those measures shall include, but not be limited to, a baseline of pre-implementation outcome metrics and the annual costs for the pilot program. CHAPTER 51. COURTS AND THEIR OFFICERS. ARTICLE 9. RETIREMENT SYSTEM FOR JUDGES OF COURTS OF RECORD. §51-9-10. Services of senior judges and justices. (a) The Legislature finds that:(1) Section seven, article VIII of the Constitution of West Virginia expressly requires the Legislature to fix judicial salaries by statute, providing that: "[j]ustices, judges and magistrates shall receive the salaries fixed by law".(2) Occasionally, circumstances may require the extended assignment of senior judges and justices, necessitating the Legislature to prescribe such circumstances when the limitations on compensation of senior judges and justices receiving retirement benefits may be exceeded.(b) The Legislature recognizes and acknowledges the authority of the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals to recall retired circuit court judges, family court judges, judges of the Intermediate Court of Appeals, and justices of the Supreme Court of Appeals for temporary assignment and to create a panel of such senior judges and justices to serve in certain circumstances including, but not limited to, serving temporarily in the event of a protracted illness or medical condition, lengthy suspension, or other unfilled vacancy; serving temporarily in a circuit to assist with an excess of pending matters identified by the administrative director through statistical analysis; mentoring or assisting a sitting judge as directed by the administrative director; serving temporarily in a circuit in the event of a recusal or disqualification of a judge or justice; serving as a child protection commissioner pursuant to §49-4-118 of this code; serving as a law clerk for a circuit judge, a judge of the intermediate court of appeals, or a justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals; or presiding over cases as a member of the mass litigation or business court: Provided, That extended assignment of retired judges and justices must not be utilized in such a way as to threaten the qualified status of the Judges' Retirement System under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, including Treasury Regulation §1.401(a)-1(b)(1) requiring that a qualified plan must be established primarily to provide payment of definitely determinable benefits to its employees after retirement or attainment of normal retirement age.(c) Senior intermediate court judges, circuit court judges, and justices recalled and assigned to service shall receive per diem compensation set by the Supreme Court of Appeals, but not to exceed $430 for each day actually served: Provided, That the combined total of per diem compensation and retirement benefits paid to a senior judge or justice during a single calendar year may not exceed the annual salary of a sitting circuit judge, except as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, for purposes of maintaining judicial efficacy and continuity in judicial decision making, a senior judge or justice may continue to receive per diem compensation after the combined total of per diem compensation and retirement benefits paid to the senior judge or justice during that calendar year exceeds the annual salary of a sitting circuit judge if the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals enters an administrative order certifying there are certain extraordinary circumstances involving the necessary absence of a sitting judicial officer because of a protracted illness or medical condition, or a lengthy suspension which necessitate the extended assignment of the senior judge or justice. Immediately upon entering such an order, the Chief Justice shall submit copies of the order to the State Auditor and the State Treasurer.(e) In addition to the per diem compensation authorized by this section, senior judges and justices recalled to service may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(f) Senior family court judges recalled and assigned to service shall receive per diem compensation set by the Supreme Court of Appeals, but not to exceed $325 for each day actually served: Provided, That the combined total per diem compensation and retirement benefits paid to a senior family court judge during a single calendar year may not exceed the annual salary of a sitting family court judge, except as set forth in subsection (d) of this section. In addition to the per diem compensation authorized by this section, senior family court judges recalled to service may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(g) Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a retirant who becomes employed by the Supreme Court after the effective date of his or her retirement must have a bona fide separation from service upon retirement to be eligible for an annuity under the retirement system. If a retirant fails to have a bona fide separation from service upon retirement or if such retirant or the participating public employer fails to comply with subsection (h) of this section in a manner satisfactory to the board, then the member’s retirement shall be voided and the member shall repay to the system the gross amount of all annuity payments received related to such voided retirement. The board may take any actions necessary or appropriate in accordance with the provisions of §51-9-18 to recover such annuity payments so that an in-service distribution is not deemed to have been made.    (h) Prior to any retirant subsequently becoming reemployed by the Supreme Court, whether on a permanent, full-time, part-time, substitute, per diem, temporary or leased employee basis, the Supreme Court shall notify the board and the retirant, in writing, if and when any such potential employment will negatively impact the retirant’s retired status or benefits. Upon the retirant’s acceptance of such employment, the participating public employer shall notify the board, in writing, of the retirant’s subsequent employment. The retirement board may also require of retirants and the Supreme Court such reports, forms and verifications as it deems necessary to ensure that a bona fide separation from service from retirement has occurred. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home